dev/verbs/VERBS-scraps.lexc
LEXICON IV-CAUS-DIR-AR
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NEG ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r ABIL-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NECE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NON-FINITE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r PASS-DIR-AR ;
NEG ;
FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
ABIL-AR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;


LEXICON CAUS-T-AR
%<caus%>:%>t NEG ;
%<caus%>:%>t FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>t ABIL-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>t NECE ;
%<caus%>:%>t NON-FINITE ;
NEG ;
FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
ABIL-IR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;

LEXICON IMPERFECTIVE
%<imper%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON NEG
%<neg%>:%>m%{a%} REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON AOR-AR
%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r PERS1 ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%> PERS5;
%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r KEN ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z KEN ;

LEXICON AOR-IR
%<aor%>:%>%{i%}r PERS1 ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%> PERS5;
%<aor%>:%>%{i%}r KEN ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z KEN;

LEXICON AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL
%<aorcond%>:%>%{i%}rs%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}r%>l%{A%}r%>%s%{A%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>:%>m%{A%}z%>s%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}z%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ;

LEXICON AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL
%<aorcond%>:%>%{A%}rs%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>:%>m%{A%}z%>s%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}z%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ;

LEXICON ABIL-AR
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{a%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil GERUND ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} GERUND ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{A%} NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{A%} PERS5 ;
NON-FINITE ;

GERUND ;

LEXICON ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL

%<abil%>%<cond%>:%>%{A%}bilse PERS2  ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>%<cond%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%}z%>s%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>%<cond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%}z%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ;

LEXICON ABIL-IR
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{a%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil GERUND ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} GERUND ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{A%} PERS5 ;
NON-FINITE ;
FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
GERUND ;

LEXICON PRESENT-CONTINUOUS

%<pcont%>:%>%{I%}yor PERS1 ;
%<pcont%>:%>%{I%}yor KEN ;

LEXICON PAST-CONTINUOUS

%<pastcnt%>:%>%{I%}yord%{I%} PERS1-NO3PL ;
%<pastcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}yord%{I%}%>l%{A%}r # ; ! Dir/LR
%<pastcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}yor%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%} # ; 

LEXICON CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS

%<condcnt%>:%>%{I%}yors%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS 

%<evidcnt%>:%>m%{I%}ş PERS1-NO3PL ;
%<evidcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}ş%>d%{I%}%>l%{A%}r # ; ! Dir/LR
%<evidcnt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}ş%>l%{A%}r%>%d%{I%} # ; 

LEXICON FUTURE

%<fut%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}k PERS1 ;

LEXICON FUTURE-PERFECT

%<futp%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}kt%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<futp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c{A%}k%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%}  # ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL

%<fute%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}km%{I%}ş PERS1 ;

LEXICON FUTURE-CONDITIONAL

%<futc%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}ks%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON PAST

%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON PAST-CONDITIONAL

%<pastc%>:%>d%{I%}ys%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-PAST

%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş PERS1 ;
%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş KEN ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT

%<evidp%>:%>m%{I%}şt%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON AORIST-AR-PERFECT

%<aorp%>:%>%{A%}rd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}rd%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON AORIST-IR-PERFECT

%<aorp%>:%>%{i%}rd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}r%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}rd%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL

%<evidc%>:%>m%{I%}şs%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL

%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL-PAST

%<condp%>:%>s%{A%}yd%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL

%<condp%>:%>s%{A%}ym%{I%}ş PERS1 ;

LEXICON NECE

%<nece%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} PERS3 ;             ! prc, + copula
%<necepast%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} PERS3-PAST ;

LEXICON JUSSIVE

%<juss%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<juss%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}nl%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE

%<imp%>:%> PERS4 ;

LEXICON EXHORTATIVE

%<exh%>:%> PERS6 ;

LEXICON GERUND

%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} SUBST ;
%<ger2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}k SUBST ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{I%}ş SUBST ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}c%{A%}k SUBST ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}n SUBST ;
%<ger6%>:%>m%{A%}k SUBST ;

LEXICON NON-FINITE

%<inf%>:%>m%{A%}k # ;

%<prc1%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}n ATTR ;

%<gna1%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}r%{A%}k # ;
%<gna2%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}p # ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL

%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} PERS2 ;


LEXICON FINITE-VERBS-AR

AOR-AR ;
AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
IMPERATIVE ;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL;

LEXICON FINITE-VERBS-IR

AOR-IR ;
AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
IMPERATIVE ;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL;

LEXICON REGULAR-NEGATIVE 

NECE ;
CONDITIONAL ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
IMPERATIVE ;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;


LEXICON V-TV-DIR-IR


%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;


LEXICON V-TV-IR-AR


%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-IR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;

LEXICON Verbs
taş:taş V-TV-IR-AR ; ! ""
vur:vur V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
ye:y%{e%} V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
yer% ver:yer% ver V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aban:aban V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aksat:aksat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
akıt:akıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aldan:aldan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aldat:aldat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
alçalt:alçalt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
alıkoy:alıkoy V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
anlat:anlat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
arıt:arıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
asılan:asılan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
atlat:atlat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
avut:avut V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
ayart:ayart V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aydınlat:aydınlat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
ayılt:ayılt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
azıt:azıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
aşırt:aşırt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
devit:devit V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
değin:değin V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dokun:dokun V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dolan:dolan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dönüş:dönüş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
düzelt:düzelt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
düşün:düşün V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
dımbırdat:dımbırdat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
eriş:eriş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
eğin:eğin V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
eğit:eğit V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
eğrit:eğrit V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
gereksin:gereksin V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
giriş:giriş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
takış:takış V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
tıkat:tıkat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! ""
kirlet:kirlet V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "dirty"
kullan:kullan V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "use"
kuşan:kuşan V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "gird oneself with"
kuşat:kuşat V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "hedge round"
not:not al V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "take a note"
öğren:öğren V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "learn"
öğret:öğret V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "teach"
öğüt:öğüt V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "digest"
öngör:öngör V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "set forth"
ör:ör V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "knit"
özen:özen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "imitate someone"
paylaş:paylaş V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "share"
sahiplen:sahiplen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "lay claims to"
salıver:salıver V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "demobilise"
savun:savun V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "defend"
süpür:süpür V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "sweep"
tartış:tartış V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "dispute"
tüket:tüket V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "consume"
unut:unut V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "unutmak"
üret:üret V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "produce"
üslen:üslen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "use place for military base"
üstlen:üstlen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "undertake"
uyar:uyar V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "warn"
ver:ver V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "give up"
vur:vur V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "hit"
yalıt:yalıt V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "isolate"
ye:ye V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "ear"
yen:yen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "win"
yıprat:yıprat V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "wear out"
yoğur:yoğur V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "knead"
yönet:yönet V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "manage"
yont:yont V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "sculp"
abar:abar V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "exaggerate"
aktar:aktar V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "transfer"
al:al V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "take, buy"
alçal:alçal V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "lower"
alevlen:alevlen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "catch on fire"
alış:alış V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "familiarise with"
arıt:arıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "purify someone"
atfet:atfet V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "attrube"
aydınlat:aydınlat V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "enlighten"
ayrış:ayrış V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "decompose"
başvur:başvur V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "apply"
beğen:beğen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "like, advire"
bil:bil V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "know"
bilgilen:bilgilen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "learn"
birleş:birleş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "unite"
boşal:boşal V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "be emptied"
bulan:bulan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "cloud"
çarpıt:çarpıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "warp"
çevir:çevir V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "translate"
dağıt:dağıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "distribute"
danış:danış V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "consult"
değiş:değiş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "change"
dolaş:dolaş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "walk around"
düşün:düşün V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "think"
duyur:duyur V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "announce"
eğit:eğit V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "teach"
endişelen:endişelen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "worry about"
faydalan:faydalan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "exploit"
getir:getir V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "bring"
gönder:gönder V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "send"
göster:göster V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "show"
gücen:gücen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "be hurt"
haberleş:haberleş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "be in touch"
haşla:haşla V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "boil"
haykır:haykır V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "yell"
ilet:ilet V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "send"
incit:incit V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "hurt"
işit:işit V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "hear"
kabullen:kabullen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "confess"
kapsa:kapsa V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "include"
kayır:kayır V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "show favour"
iç:iç V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "drink"
aş:aş V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "go beyond / exaggerate"
geç:geç V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "pass"
kaç:kaç V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "escape"
şaş:şaş V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "wonder"
